Idaho, session 2026, S1254.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the Legislature to
clarify the existing right of persons licensed to practice chiropractic in
this state to prescribe certain prescription drug products.
SECTION 2. That Section 54-716, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-716. ADMINISTERING PRESCRIPTION DRUG PRODUCTS. (1) A licensee un-
der this chapter who is certified in clinical nutrition may prescribe, ob-
tain, and independently administer, during chiropractic practice, the fol-
lowing prescription drug products:
(a) Vitamins:
(i) Vitamin A;
(ii) All B vitamins; and
(iii) Vitamin C;
(b) Minerals:
(i) Ammonium molybdate;
(ii) Calcium;
(iii) Chromium;
(iv) Copper;
(v) Iodine;
(vi) Magnesium;
(vii) Manganese;
(viii) Potassium;
(ix) Selenium;
(x) Sodium; and
(xi) Zinc;
(c) Fluids:
(i) Dextrose;
(ii) Lactated ringers;
(iii) Plasma lyte;
(iv) Saline; and
(v) Sterile water;
(d) Epinephrine; and
(e) Oxygen for use during an emergency or allergic reaction.
(2) The prescription drug products listed in subsection (1) of this
section may be administered through oral, topical, intravenous, intramuscu-


lar or subcutaneous routes. The route of administration and dosing shall be
in accordance with the product's labeling as approved by the federal food and
drug administration or with the manufacturer's instructions.
(3) The prescription drug products listed in subsection (1) of this
section shall be obtained from a wholesale distributor, manufacturer, phar-
macy or outsourcing facility licensed under chapter 17, title 54, Idaho
Code.
(4) No vitamin or mineral may be compounded, as defined in section
54-1704, Idaho Code, by a chiropractic physician. A compounded drug product
containing two (2) or more of the approved vitamins or minerals shall be ob-
tained for office use from either an outsourcing facility or a compounding
pharmacy licensed under chapter 17, title 54, Idaho Code.
(5) Nothing herein would remove or impact the ability of a chiropractic
physician who does not obtain a clinical nutrition certification to continue
to utilize nonprescriptive nutritional supplements.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.